Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5301.01
Use of lead-free materials; rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding the use of lead-free materials in public water systems in compliance with standards established in accordance with the federal Safe Drinking Water Act.

Laws 1988, LB 383, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 29;

Laws 2016, LB899, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 73.